Louisiana, session 2026, HB506.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 47:463.73(A) and (G) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S.
47:463.243 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§463.73. Special prestige license plates; Louisiana parochial, public, and private
high schools
A.(1) The secretary of the Department of Public Safety and Corrections shall
establish a special prestige license plate for the Louisiana parochial, public, and
private high schools which have a minimum of one hundred applicants for such
plate. The license plate shall be restricted to passenger cars, pickup trucks, vans, and
recreational vehicles. The license plate shall be of a color and design selected by the
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 506 ENROLLED
respective high school student council subject to the approval of the respective high
school principal, provided that it is in compliance with R.S. 47:463(A)(3).
(2) The Department of Public Safety and Corrections, office of motor
vehicles, shall create these special prestige license plates when the applicable
statutory provisions are met and the department's electronic vehicle and registration
system is updated to accommodate the creation of the new plates.
* * *
G. The secretary shall establish special prestige license plates for Archbishop
Hannan High School, Jesuit High School, Mount Carmel Academy, the Academy of
the Sacred Heart, Saint Katharine Drexel Preparatory School, Acadiana High School,
Baker High School, East Feliciana High School, Glen Oaks High School, Neville
High School, Carroll High School, Brusly High School, Port Allen High School,
Covington High School, Scotlandville Magnet High School, St. Michael the
Archangel High School, St. Mary's Dominican High School, St. Edmund Catholic
School, St. Paul's School, St. Scholastica Academy, St. Mary's Academy, Acadiana
High School, Lafayette High School, Carencro High School, Northside High School,
Southside High School, David Thibodaux STEM Magnet Academy, Ovey Comeaux
High School, Early College Academy, Edward J. Sam Accelerated School of
Lafayette, and any other parochial, public, or private Louisiana high school in
accordance with the provisions of this Section as it was enacted.
* * *
§463.243. Special prestige license plate; blackout plates
A.(1) The secretary of the Department of Public Safety and Corrections shall
establish a special prestige motor vehicle license plate to be known as the "blackout"
plate, provided that there is a minimum of one thousand applicants for such plate.
The plate shall be restricted to use on passenger cars, pickup trucks, recreational
vehicles, motorcycles, and vans.
(2) The Department of Public Safety and Corrections, office of motor
vehicles, shall create these special prestige license plates when the applicable
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 506 ENROLLED
statutory provisions are met and the department's electronic vehicle and registration
system is updated to accommodate the creation of the new plates.
B. The design shall display white alpha-numeric series on a black
background in compliance with R.S. 47:463(A)(3). The design shall include the
word "LOUISIANA" centered at the top or bottom of the plate.
C. The special license plate shall be issued, upon application to any citizen
of Louisiana in the same manner as any other motor vehicle license plate.
D. The department shall collect an annual royalty fee of twenty-five dollars
that shall be disbursed in accordance with Subsection E of this Section. This fee
shall be in addition to the standard motor vehicle license tax imposed by Article VII,
Section 5 of the Constitution of Louisiana and a handling fee of three dollars and
fifty cents for each plate to be retained by the department to offset a portion of
administrative costs.
E. The annual royalty fee shall be collected by the department and forwarded
to the Louisiana Fraternal Order of Police as a charitable donation to the association
by the applicant.
F. The secretary shall promulgate and adopt rules and regulations as are
necessary to implement the provisions of this Section.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.